Montana, session 2025, HB834.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Government evidence DATA and impact commission. (1) There is a government
evidence data and impact commission.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 834
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 834
(2) (a) The commission consists of the following voting members:
(i) the presiding officer of the senate finance and claims committee or the officer's designee;
(ii) the presiding officer of the house appropriations committee or the officer's designee;
(iii) the majority presiding officer and the minority vice presiding officer of the legislative audit
committee or their designees;
(iv) a member of the modernization and risk analysis committee appointed by the presiding officer
of the legislative finance committee;
(v) a member of the legislature appointed by the governor who is from the opposite party of the
member from the modernization and risk analysis committee;
(vi) the budget director or the director’s designee;
(vii) the director of the department of administration or the director’s designee;
(viii) the director of the office of state public defender or the director’s designee;
(ix) two directors of a state agency appointed by the governor or their designees; and
(x) one member of the public appointed by the governor.
(b) The commission consists of the following ex officio, nonvoting members:
(i) the legislative fiscal analyst;
(ii) the legislative auditor:
(iii) a staff member from the legislative services division's legal services office;
(iv) a deputy budget director; and
(v) the chief data officer.
(3) Appointed members of the commission must be compensated and receive travel expenses as
provided for in 2-15-124 for each day in attendance at commission meetings or in the performance of any duty
or service as a commission member.
(4) (a) The department of administration shall staff the commission and pay for the operational
costs of the commission.
(b) The office of budget and program planning and the legislative fiscal division shall provide
research and analysis at the request of the commission or its legislative members.
(c) The legislative services division shall provide audio and visual services for meetings held in the
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 834
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 834
capitol building.
(5) The commission shall elect a presiding officer from one of the voting members who is not a
legislator and elect a vice presiding officer from one of the legislative members.
(6) Starting June 1, 2025, the commission shall meet on a quarterly basis when the legislature is
not in session.
(7) The commission shall reserve time at each commission meeting for public comment. Public
participation is encouraged.
Section 2. Purpose. (1) The commission is charged with developing a system of evidence and
impact analysis and with mak ing recommendations for the implementation of the analysis on executive and
legislative decisionmaking and recommending a system for the collection and integration of targeted data for
use by the legislature and the executive branch in analyzing outcomes of the agency programs, effective use of
state resources, and efficient administration of state government.
(2) The system developed must allow policymakers to identify inefficient, redundant, and
antiquated programs in state government. A report of an evidence and impact analysis conducted using the
developed system may include recommendations for improvements in the analyzed programs.
Section 3. Duties. The commission must receive reports, including but not limited to reports on the
following:
(1) successful data system implementations that demonstrate existing capabilities to maximize the
efficient use of data to inform decisionmaking;
(2) examples of programs for which an evidence a data and impact analysis is most likely to
produce efficiencies, cost savings, or more informed decisionmaking;
(3) a review of laws governing the administration of state government and of how to make the
operation of state government efficient and transparent;
(4) the structure of executive and legislative oversight to facilitate efficient access to data;
(5) (a) how to prioritize the data and evidence that has the most impact on policy decisions; and
(b) the number of evidence and impact analyses that can be conducted within a certain timeframe;
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 834
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 834
and
(6) the quantified cost to the state for providing efficient access to data and evidence.
Section 4. Appropriation. There is appropriated $75,000 from the general fund to the department of
administration for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, and continuing into the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
for the administration and costs of the commission.
Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
Section 6. Termination. [This act] terminates December 31, 2026.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 834
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 834, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 834
INTRODUCED BY B. MERCER, J. ESP
AN ACT ESTABLISHING THE GOVERNMENT EVIDENCE DATA AND IMPACT COMMISSION; OUTLINING
MEMBERSHIP OF THE COMMISSION; PROVIDING DUTIES OF THE COMMISSION; PROVIDING AN
APPROPRIATION; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE AND A TERMINATION DATE.”